Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 325E.046, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Certification of products. deleted text begin Beginning January 1, 2026,deleted text end A manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler may not sell or offer for sale and any other person may not knowingly sell or offer for sale in this state a covered product labeled as "biodegradable" or "compostable" unless the covered product is certified as meeting the requirements of subdivision 1 or 2, as applicable, by an entity that: deleted text begin (1) is a nonprofit corporation; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) as its primary focus of operation,deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end promotes the production, use, and appropriate end of life for materials and products that are designed to fully biodegrade in specific biologically active environments such as industrial composting; and deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end is technically capable of and willing to perform analysis necessary to determine a product's compliance with subdivision 1 or 2, as applicable. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end